Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-456.01
Free-earned landowner elk permit; issuance; conditions.

(1) The commission may issue one free-earned landowner elk permit for the taking of either sex of elk to any person owning or leasing at least eighty acres of farm or ranch land used for agricultural purposes, or to any member of the immediate family of such person as defined in subdivision (2)(a) of section 37-455, when the qualifying number of antlerless elk have been harvested on such land by hunters with a permit issued under section 37-448 or 37-450. Such permit shall be limited to hunting on the lands owned or leased by the qualifying landowner. Receipt of a free-earned landowner elk permit shall not in any way affect a person's eligibility for a permit issued under section 37-450 or 37-455.

(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations prescribing issuance of free-earned landowner elk permits, accumulation of antlerless elk harvests, procedures, forms, and requirements for documentation by landowners or lessees as described in subsection (1) of this section to annually report antlerless elk harvested on their property for eligibility, and the number of antlerless elk required to be harvested on such property to qualify for a free-earned landowner elk permit.

Laws 2021, LB507, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 16.
July 18, 2026